Utah statutes.
63G-6a-305.   Duty of chief procurement officer in maintaining specifications.

(1)  The chief procurement officer may prepare, issue, revise, maintain, and monitor the use of specifications for each procurement over which the chief procurement officer has authority.

(2)  The chief procurement officer shall obtain expert advice and assistance from personnel of procurement units in the development of specifications and may delegate in writing to a procurement unit the authority to prepare and utilize its own specifications.

(3)  For a procurement under Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program, any delegation by the chief procurement officer under this section shall be made to the Governor's Office of Economic Development.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

